Illinois, session 104th, HB5412.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Finance Authority Act is amended 5by changing Sections 825-80, 825-81, and 825-85 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3501/825-80)7    Sec. 825-80. Fire truck revolving loan program.8    (a) This Section is a continuation and re-enactment of the 9fire truck revolving loan program enacted as Section 3-27 of 10the Rural Bond Bank Act by Public Act 93-35, effective June 24, 112003, and repealed by Public Act 93-205, effective January 1, 122004. Under the Rural Bond Bank Act, the program was 13administered by the Rural Bond Bank and the State Fire 14Marshal.15    (a-5) For purposes of this Section, "brush truck" means a 16pickup chassis with or equipped with a flatbed or a pickup box. 17The truck must be rated by the manufacturer as between 18three-fourths of a ton and one ton and outfitted with a fire or 19rescue apparatus. 20    (b) The Authority and the State Fire Marshal may jointly 21administer a fire truck revolving loan program. The program 22shall, in instances where sufficient loan funds exist to 23permit applications to be accepted, provide zero-interest and   HB5412- 2 -LRB104 20259 HLH 33710 b1low-interest loans for the purchase of fire trucks by a fire 2department, a fire protection district, or a township fire 3department. For the purchase of brush trucks by a fire 4department, a fire protection district, or a township fire 5department, the program shall provide loans at a 2% rate of 6simple interest per year for a brush truck if both the chassis 7and the apparatus are built outside of Illinois, a 1% rate of 8simple interest per year for a brush truck if either the 9chassis or the apparatus is built in Illinois, or a 0% rate of 10interest for a brush truck if both the chassis and the 11apparatus are built in Illinois. The Authority shall make 12loans based on need, as determined by the State Fire Marshal.13    (c) The loan funds, subject to appropriation, shall be 14paid out of the Illinois Finance Authority Fire Truck 15Revolving Loan Fund, a locally held fund established by the 16Authority a special fund in the State Treasury. The Fund shall 17consist of any moneys transferred or appropriated into the 18Fund, as well as all repayments of loans made under the program 19and any balance existing in the Fund on the effective date of 20this Section. The Fund shall be used for loans to fire 21departments and fire protection districts to purchase fire 22trucks and brush trucks and for no other purpose. All interest 23earned on moneys in the Fund shall be deposited into the Fund. 24As soon as practical after January 1, 2013 (the effective date 25of Public Act 97-901), all moneys in the Fire Truck Revolving 26Loan Fund shall be paid by the State Fire Marshal to the   HB5412- 3 -LRB104 20259 HLH 33710 b1Authority, and, on and after that date, all future moneys 2deposited into the Fire Truck Revolving Loan Fund under this 3Section shall be paid by the State Fire Marshal to the 4Authority under the continuing appropriation provision of 5subsection (c-1) of this Section; provided that the Authority 6and the State Fire Marshal enter into an intergovernmental 7agreement to use the moneys transferred to the Authority from 8the Fund solely for the purposes for which the moneys would 9otherwise be used under this Section and to set forth 10procedures to otherwise administer the use of the moneys. 11    (c-1) There is hereby appropriated, on a continuing annual 12basis in each fiscal year, from the Fire Truck Revolving Loan 13Fund, a special fund in the State Treasury, the amount, if any, 14of funds received into the Fire Truck Revolving Loan Fund to 15the State Fire Marshal for payment to the Authority for the 16purposes for which the moneys would otherwise be used under 17this Section. 18    (d) A loan for the purchase of fire trucks or brush trucks 19may not exceed $750,000 per truck $350,000 to any fire 20department or fire protection district. A loan for the 21purchase of brush trucks may not exceed $100,000 per truck. 22The repayment period for the loan may not exceed 20 years. The 23fire department or fire protection district shall repay each 24year at least 5% of the principal amount borrowed or the 25remaining balance of the loan, whichever is less. All 26repayments of loans shall be deposited into the Illinois   HB5412- 4 -LRB104 20259 HLH 33710 b1Finance Authority Fire Truck Revolving Loan Fund.2    (e) The Authority and the State Fire Marshal may adopt 3rules in accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure 4Act to administer the program. 5    (f) Notwithstanding the repeal of Section 3-27 of the 6Rural Bond Bank Act, all otherwise lawful actions taken on or 7after January 1, 2004 and before the effective date of this 8Section by any person under the authority originally granted 9by that Section 3-27, including without limitation the 10granting, acceptance, and repayment of loans for the purchase 11of fire trucks, are hereby validated, and the rights and 12obligations of all parties to any such loan are hereby 13acknowledged and confirmed. 14(Source: P.A. 97-900, eff. 8-6-12; 97-901, eff. 1-1-13; 1598-463, eff. 8-16-13; 98-662, eff. 6-23-14.) 16    (20 ILCS 3501/825-81)17    Sec. 825-81. Fire station revolving loan program. 18    (a) The Authority and the State Fire Marshal may jointly 19administer a fire station revolving loan program. The program 20shall, in instances where sufficient loan funds exist to 21permit applications to be accepted, provide zero-interest and 22low-interest loans for the construction, rehabilitation, 23remodeling, or expansion of a fire station or the acquisition 24of land for the construction or expansion of a fire station by 25a fire department, a fire protection district, or a township   HB5412- 5 -LRB104 20259 HLH 33710 b1fire department. Once the program receives funding, the 2Authority shall make loans based on need, as determined by the 3State Fire Marshal.4    (b) The loan funds, subject to appropriation, may be paid 5out of the Illinois Finance Authority Fire Station Revolving 6Loan Fund, a locally held fund established by the Authority a 7special fund in the State treasury. The Fund may consist of any 8moneys transferred or appropriated into the Fund, as well as 9all repayments of loans made under the program. Once the 10program receives funding, the Fund may be used for loans to 11fire departments and fire protection districts to construct, 12rehabilitate, remodel, or expand fire stations or acquire land 13for the construction or expansion of fire stations and for no 14other purpose. All interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall 15be deposited into the Fund. As soon as practical after the 16effective date of this amendatory Act of the 97th General 17Assembly, all moneys in the Fire Station Revolving Loan Fund 18shall be paid by the State Fire Marshal to the Authority, and, 19on and after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 2097th General Assembly, all future moneys deposited into the 21Fire Station Revolving Loan Fund under this Section shall be 22paid by the State Fire Marshal to the Authority under the 23continuing appropriation provision of subsection (b-1) of this 24Section; provided that the Authority and the State Fire 25Marshal enter into an intergovernmental agreement to use the 26moneys paid by the State Fire Marshal to the Authority from the   HB5412- 6 -LRB104 20259 HLH 33710 b1Fund solely for the purposes for which the moneys would 2otherwise be used under this Section and to set forth 3procedures to otherwise administer the use of the moneys.4    (b-1) There is hereby appropriated, on a continuing annual 5basis in each fiscal year, from the Fire Station Revolving 6Loan Fund, a special fund in the State Treasury, the amount, if 7any, of funds received into the Fire Station Revolving Loan 8Fund to the State Fire Marshal for payment to the Authority for 9the purposes for which the moneys would otherwise be used 10under this Section. 11    (c) A loan under the program may not exceed $2,000,000 to 12any fire department or fire protection district. The repayment 13period for the loan may not exceed 25 years. The fire 14department or fire protection district shall repay each year 15at least 4% of the principal amount borrowed or the remaining 16balance of the loan, whichever is less. All repayments of 17loans shall be deposited into the Fire Station Revolving Loan 18Fund.19    (d) The Authority and the State Fire Marshal may adopt 20rules in accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure 21Act to administer the program. 22(Source: P.A. 96-135, eff. 8-7-09; 96-1172, eff. 7-22-10; 2397-901, eff. 1-1-13.) 24    (20 ILCS 3501/825-85)25    Sec. 825-85. Ambulance revolving loan program.  HB5412- 7 -LRB104 20259 HLH 33710 b1    (a) The Authority and the State Fire Marshal may jointly 2administer an ambulance revolving loan program. The program 3shall, in instances where sufficient loan funds exist to 4permit applications to be accepted, provide zero-interest and 5low-interest loans for the purchase of ambulances by a fire 6department, a fire protection district, a township fire 7department, or a non-profit ambulance service. The Authority 8shall make loans based on need, as determined by the State Fire 9Marshal.10    (b) The loan funds, subject to appropriation, shall be 11paid out of the Illinois Finance Authority Ambulance Revolving 12Loan Fund, a locally held fund established by the Authority a 13special fund in the State treasury. The Fund shall consist of 14any moneys transferred or appropriated into the Fund, as well 15as all repayments of loans made under the program. The Fund 16shall be used for loans to fire departments, fire protection 17districts, and non-profit ambulance services to purchase 18ambulances and for no other purpose. All interest earned on 19moneys in the Fund shall be deposited into the Fund. As soon as 20practical after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 21the 97th General Assembly, all moneys in the Ambulance 22Revolving Loan Fund shall be paid by the State Fire Marshal to 23the Authority, and, on and after the effective date of this 24amendatory Act of the 97th General Assembly, all future moneys 25deposited into the Ambulance Revolving Loan Fund under this 26Section shall be paid by the State Fire Marshal to the   HB5412- 8 -LRB104 20259 HLH 33710 b1Authority under the continuing appropriation provision of 2subsection (b-1) of this Section; provided that the Authority 3and the State Fire Marshal enter into an intergovernmental 4agreement to use the moneys transferred to the Authority from 5the Fund solely for the purposes for which the moneys would 6otherwise be used under this Section and to set forth 7procedures to otherwise administer the use of the moneys.8    (b-1) There is hereby appropriated, on a continuing annual 9basis in each fiscal year, from the Ambulance Revolving Loan 10Fund, a special fund in the State Treasury, the amount, if any, 11of funds received into the Ambulance Revolving Loan Fund to 12the State Fire Marshal for payment to the Authority for the 13purposes for which the moneys would otherwise be used under 14this Section. 15    (c) A loan for the purchase of ambulances may not exceed 16$350,000 $200,000 to any fire department, fire protection 17district, or non-profit ambulance service. The repayment 18period for the loan may not exceed 10 years. The fire 19department, fire protection district, or non-profit ambulance 20service` shall repay each year at least 5% of the principal 21amount borrowed or the remaining balance of the loan, 22whichever is less. All repayments of loans shall be deposited 23into the Illinois Finance Authority Ambulance Revolving Loan 24Fund.25    (d) The Authority and the State Fire Marshal may adopt 26rules in accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure   HB5412- 9 -LRB104 20259 HLH 33710 b1Act to administer the program. 2(Source: P.A. 100-152, eff. 1-1-18.)